Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1008
Virtual behavioral health services; pilot program; use courthouse resources; purpose of program; report.

(1) The State Court Administrator shall create a pilot program to utilize physical space and information technology resources within Nebraska courthouses to serve as points of access for virtual behavioral health services for court-involved individuals.

(2) The pilot program shall be limited to a single probation district. Such district shall be chosen by the State Court Administrator in consultation with the probation administrator.

(3) The purpose of the program is to provide access to safe, confidential, and reliable behavioral health treatment via telehealth for individuals involved with the criminal justice system, either as defendants, probationers, or victims in a criminal proceeding.

(4) On or before June 1, 2024, the State Court Administrator shall electronically submit a report to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature regarding the pilot program.

Laws 2023, LB50, § 2.